Maryland, session 2026, HB0089.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 3 – Baltimore County
3–14–113.
BEGINNING IN 2027, THE COUNTY COUNCIL MAY, BY LOCAL LAW, GRANT TO
THE INSPECTOR GENERAL THE SAME AUTHORITY OVER BALTIMORE COUNTY
PUBLIC SCHOOLS THAT THE INSPECTOR GENERAL HAS OVER A DEPARTMENT OF
COUNTY GOVERNMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that if the Baltimore County Council adopts a local law to grant the Baltimore
County Inspector General authority over Baltimore County Public Schools under Section 1
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0089*

HOUSE BILL 89
of this Act, that the local law shall take effect at the beginning of the next following term
of office of the Inspector General.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.